Utah statutes.
73-3a-105.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

(1)  Except where inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, the procedures to be followed by the state engineer in processing and considering applications filed under this chapter, and the rights and duties of the applicants, are the same as the procedures, rights, and duties specified in Title 73, Chapter 3, relating to appropriations of water or changes in the point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use of water.

(2)  Adjudicative proceedings relating to applications made under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

